Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB267.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 177 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Acknowledgment sign" means an official sign that:
1. Meets all design and placement guidelines for acknowledgment signs
as established in the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices for
Streets and Highways as published by the United States Department of
Transportation;
2. Meets all sign design rules covered in the Standard Highway Signs
publication adopted by the United States Department of
Transportation;
3. Is located in the right-of-way; and
4. Is intended to inform the traveling public that a highway-related
service, product, or monetary contribution has been sponsored by a
private entity; and
(b) "Sponsorship agreement" means an agreement or contract between the
cabinet and a person or private entity, which is acknowledged for a
highway-related service, product, or monetary contribution provided.
(2) The cabinet may establish a sponsorship agreement that allows a person or
private entity to sponsor a welcome center or rest area. Any service, product, or
monetary contribution received by the cabinet shall be used for the maintenance
and upkeep of the welcome center or rest area.
(3) A person or private entity that enters into a sponsorship agreement with the
cabinet shall not be permitted to offer or make available commercial services or
products to the public at welcome centers or rest areas that they sponsor and
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 11/12/2025 12:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 897
which are located on the:
(a) Interstate highway system; or
(b) State highway system for prices or fees below the prevailing market rate.
(4) A sponsorship agreement shall allow the installation of acknowledgment signs
within welcome centers and rest areas and on the portion of the interstate
highway system and state highway system and associated rights-of-way near
welcome centers and rest areas.
(5) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to establish a sponsorship policy and process to enter into
sponsorship agreements to install acknowledgment signs at welcome centers and
rest areas.
(6) The sponsorship policy for sponsorship agreements that applies to all welcome
centers and rest areas shall:
(a) Be subject to approval by the Federal Highway Administration;
(b) Include requirements that eligible sponsors comply with state and federal
law prohibiting discrimination based on race, color, national origin, age,
sex, religion, disability, or any other federally protected class;
(c) Include language requiring the cabinet to terminate a sponsorship
agreement if it determines the sponsorship agreement or acknowledgment
sign:
1. Presents a safety concern;
2. Interferes with the free and safe flow of traffic; or
3. Is not in the public interest; and
(d) Describe the types of sponsors and sponsorship agreements that are
acceptable and consistent with applicable state and federal law.
(7) A person or private entity that enters into a sponsorship agreement with the
cabinet shall pay the costs of:
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 11/12/2025 12:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 897
(a) Manufacturing and installing an acknowledgment sign;
(b) Placing a sponsorship message on a sign or marker; and
(c) Removing all acknowledgment signs, messages, and markers after the
expiration or termination of the sponsorship agreement.
(8) An acknowledgment sign shall:
(a) Identify the sponsor as a sponsor of the welcome center or rest area and
include the name and logo of the sponsor;
(b) Not include, identify, or promote alcohol or tobacco products, adult-
oriented establishments, political candidacies, political issue advocacy, or
political campaign advertising;
(c) Not resemble an official traffic control device; and
(d) Comply with federal outdoor advertising regulations in accordance with 23
U.S.C. sec. 131.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 11/12/2025 12:42 PM Jacketed